Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1514
Testamentary trust, defined.

Testamentary trust shall mean a trust created by devising or bequeathing property in trust in a will as such terms are used in the Nebraska Probate Code.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 8.

Nebraska Probate Code, see section 30-2201.